Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-675
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that a permit system is necessary to protect Nebraska's ground and surface water resources and existing water users in situations where industrial users withdraw significant quantities of ground water from the aquifers of the state and in situations where such ground water is transferred from the water well site for use at another location.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 33.